California, session 20252026, AB2668.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 4927.5 of the Business and Professions Code is amended to read:4927.5. (a) For purposes of this chapter, “approved educational and training program” means a school or college offering education and training in the practice of an acupuncturist that meets all of the following requirements:(1) Offers curriculum that includes at least 3,000 hours of which at least 2,050 hours are didactic and laboratory training, and at least 950 hours are supervised clinical instruction. Has submitted that curriculum to the board, and has received board approval of the curriculum. Any school or college offering education and training in the practice of acupuncture that was approved by the board prior to January 1, 2017, has not had its approval revoked, and has not changed its curriculum since receiving board approval, is deemed to have had its curriculum approved by the board for the purposes of this section.(2) Has received full institutional approval under Article 6 (commencing with Section 94885) of Chapter 8 of Part 59 of Division 10 of Title 3 of the Education Code in the field of traditional Asian medicine, or in the case of institutions located outside of this state, approval by the appropriate governmental educational authority using standards equivalent to those of Article 6 (commencing with Section 94885) of Chapter 8 of Part 59 of Division 10 of Title 3 of the Education Code.(3) Meets any of the following:(A) Is accredited by the Accreditation Commission for Acupuncture and Herbal Medicine, or its successor entity.(B) Has been granted preaccreditation status by the Accreditation Commission for Acupuncture and Herbal Medicine, or its successor entity.(C) Has submitted a letter of intent to pursue accreditation to the Accreditation Commission for Acupuncture and Herbal Medicine, or its successor entity within 30 days of receiving full institutional approval pursuant to paragraph (2), and is granted preaccreditation status within three years of the date that letter was submitted.(b) Within 30 days after receiving curriculum pursuant to paragraph (1), the board shall review the curriculum, determine whether the curriculum satisfies the requirements established by the board, and notify the school or college, the Accreditation Commission for Acupuncture and Herbal Medicine, or its successor entity, and the Bureau for Private and Postsecondary Education of whether the board has approved the curriculum.(c) This section shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2032, and as of that date is repealed.SEC. 2. Section 4927.5 is added to the Business and Professions Code, to read:4927.5. (a) For purposes of this chapter, “approved educational and training program” means a school or college offering education and training in the practice of an acupuncturist that meets all of the following requirements:(1) Offers a curriculum that confers a doctoral degree in acupuncture and Chinese herbal medicine consisting of not less than 3,300 hours, of which at least 2,220 hours are didactic and laboratory training and at least 1,080 hours are supervised clinical instruction, and has submitted the curriculum to, and received approval from, the board. Any school or college offering education and training in the practice of acupuncture that was approved by the board prior to January 1, 2017, has not had its approval revoked, and has not changed its curriculum since receiving board approval is deemed to have had its curriculum approved by the board for the purposes of this section.(2) Has received full institutional approval under Article 6 (commencing with Section 94885) of Chapter 8 of Part 59 of Division 10 of Title 3 of the Education Code in the field of traditional Asian medicine or, in the case of institutions located outside of this state, approval by the appropriate governmental educational authority using standards equivalent to those of Article 6 (commencing with Section 94885) of Chapter 8 of Part 59 of Division 10 of Title 3 of the Education Code.(3) Meets any of the following:(A) Is accredited by the Accreditation Commission for Acupuncture and Herbal Medicine or its successor entity.(B) Has been granted preaccreditation status by the Accreditation Commission for Acupuncture and Herbal Medicine or its successor entity.(C) Has submitted a letter of intent to pursue accreditation to the Accreditation Commission for Acupuncture and Herbal Medicine or its successor entity within 30 days of receiving full institutional approval pursuant to paragraph (2), and is granted preaccreditation status within three years of the date that letter was submitted.(b) Within 30 days after receiving curriculum pursuant to paragraph (1), the board shall review the curriculum, determine whether the curriculum satisfies the requirements established by the board, and notify the school or college, the Accreditation Commission for Acupuncture and Herbal Medicine, or its successor entity, and the Bureau for Private Postsecondary Education of whether the board has approved the curriculum.(c) This section is operative on January 1, 2032.SEC. 3. Section 4936 of the Business and Professions Code is amended to read:4936. (a) No person shall use the title “licensed acupuncturist” or the abbreviation “LAc” unless the person holds a valid, unrevoked, and unsuspended license issued by the board pursuant to this chapter. (a)(b) It is unprofessional conduct for an acupuncturist to use the title titles “Doctor” or “Doctor of Acupuncture and Herbal Medicine,” or the abbreviation abbreviations “Dr.” or “D.A.H.M.,” in connection with the practice of acupuncture unless he or she possesses they possess a license that authorizes the use of those titles or abbreviations or they possesses an earned doctorate a doctoral degree from an accredited, approved, or authorized educational institution as set forth under Chapter 8 (commencing with Section 94800) of Part 59 of Division 10 of Title 3 of the Education Code, which is in acupuncture, oriental medicine, a biological science, or is otherwise related to the authorized practice of an acupuncturist as set forth in Sections 4927 and 4937.(b)(c) The use of the title “Doctor” or the abbreviation “Dr.” by an acupuncturist as authorized in subdivision (a) without further indicating the type of license or degree which authorizes that use shall constitute unprofessional conduct.SECTION 1.SEC. 4. Section 4938 of the Business and Professions Code is amended to read:4938. (a) The board shall issue a license to practice acupuncture to any person who makes an application and meets the following requirements:(1) Is at least 18 years of age.(2) Furnishes satisfactory evidence of completion of one of the following:(A) (i) An approved educational and training program.(ii) If an applicant began an educational and training program at a school or college that submitted a letter of intent to pursue accreditation to, or attained candidacy status from, the Accreditation Commission for Acupuncture and Herbal Medicine, or its successor entity, but the commission subsequently denied the school or college candidacy status or accreditation, respectively, the board may review and evaluate the educational training and clinical experience to determine whether to waive the requirements set forth in this subdivision with respect to that applicant.(B) Satisfactory completion of a tutorial program in the practice of an acupuncturist that is approved by the board.(C) In the case of an applicant who has completed education and training outside the United States, documented educational training and clinical experience that meets the standards established pursuant to Sections 4939 and 4941.(3) Passes a written examination administered by the board that tests the applicant’s ability, competency, and knowledge in the practice of an acupuncturist. The written examination shall be developed by the Office of Professional Examination Services of the Department of Consumer Affairs within the Business and Consumer Services Agency. Affairs.(4) Is not subject to denial pursuant to Division 1.5 (commencing with Section 475).(5) Completes a clinical internship training program approved by the board. The clinical internship training program shall not exceed nine months in duration and shall be located in a clinic in this state that is an approved educational and training program. The length of the clinical internship shall depend upon the grades received in the examination and the clinical training already satisfactorily completed by the individual prior to taking the examination. The purpose of the clinical internship training program shall be to ensure a minimum level of clinical competence.(b) Each applicant who qualifies for a license shall pay, as a condition precedent to its issuance and in addition to other fees required, the initial licensure fee.(c) This section shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2032, and as of that date is repealed.SEC. 5. Section 4938 is added to the Business and Professions Code, to read:4938. (a) The board shall issue a license to practice acupuncture to any person who makes an application and meets the following requirements:(1) Is at least 18 years of age.(2) Furnishes satisfactory evidence of completion of one of the following:(A) (i) An approved educational and training program, as specified in Section 4927.5.(ii) If an applicant began an educational and training program at a school or college that submitted a letter of intent to pursue accreditation to, or attained candidacy status from, the Accreditation Commission for Acupuncture and Herbal Medicine or its successor entity, but the commission subsequently denied the school or college candidacy status or accreditation, respectively, the board may review and evaluate the educational training and clinical experience to determine whether to waive the requirements set forth in this subdivision with respect to that applicant.(B) Satisfactory completion of a tutorial program in the practice of an acupuncturist that is approved by the board.(C) In the case of an applicant who has completed education and training outside the United States, documented educational training and clinical experience that meets the standards established pursuant to Sections 4939 and 4941.(3) Passes a written examination administered by the board that tests the applicant’s ability, competency, and knowledge in the practice of an acupuncturist. The written examination shall be developed by the Office of Professional Examination Services of the Department of Consumer Affairs.(4) Is not subject to denial pursuant to Division 1.5 (commencing with Section 475).(5) Completes a clinical internship training program approved by the board. The clinical internship training program shall not exceed nine months in duration and shall be located in a clinic in this state that is an approved educational and training program. The length of the clinical internship shall depend upon the grades received in the examination and the clinical training already satisfactorily completed by the individual prior to taking the examination. The purpose of the clinical internship training program shall be to ensure a minimum level of clinical competence.(b) Each applicant who qualifies for a license shall pay, as a condition precedent to its issuance and in addition to other fees required, the initial licensure fee.(c) A licensee who was issued a license before January 1, 2032, and satisfied the requirement of completing an approved educational and training program, as those requirements existed before January 1, 2032, shall be deemed to have satisfied the requirements for completing an approved educational and training program.(d) This section is operative on January 1, 2032.